en: Field hockey goal size standard: Custom; FIH indoor regulation; FIH outdoor regulation; Junior; Mini; Small training; Youth; Other
pt-BR: Tamanho padrão do gol de hóquei em campo: Personalizado; Regulamentação FIH indoor; Regulamentação FIH outdoor; Júnior; Mini; Treino pequeno; Juvenil; Outro
vi: Tiêu chuẩn kích thước khung thành khúc côn cầu: Tùy chỉnh; Tiêu chuẩn sân trong nhà FIH; Tiêu chuẩn sân ngoài trời FIH; Thiếu niên; Mini; Tập luyện nhỏ; Trẻ em; Khác
th: ขนาดมาตรฐานของประตูฮอกกี้สนาม: กำหนดเอง; มาตรฐานในร่ม FIH; มาตรฐานกลางแจ้ง FIH; จูเนียร์; มินิ; เทรนนิงขนาดเล็ก; เยาวชน; อื่นๆ
el: Πρότυπο μέγεθος γκολ χόκεϊ επί χόρτου: Προσαρμοσμένο; Κανονισμών FIH εσωτερικού χώρου; Κανονισμών FIH εξωτερικού χώρου; Junior; Mini; Μικρό προπόνησης; Εφήβων/Νέων; Άλλο
zh-TW: 曲棍球球門尺寸標準: 自訂; FIH 室內標準; FIH 室外標準; 兒童; 迷你; 小型訓練; 青少年; 其他
lt-LT: Žolės riedulio vartų dydžio standartas: Pasirinktinis; FIH vidaus standartas; FIH lauko standartas; Jaunių; Mini; Mažas treniruočių; Jaunimo; Kita
sk-SK: Štandardná veľkosť bránky na pozemný hokej: Vlastné; Podľa halových pravidiel FIH; Podľa vonkajších pravidiel FIH; Juniorské; Mini; Malé tréningové; Mládežnícke; Iné
es: Portería de hockey sobre césped de tamaño estándar: Personalizado; Reglamentario para interiores FIH; Reglamentario para exteriores FIH; Júnior; Mini; Entrenamiento pequeño; Juvenil; Otro
nb: Standard størrelse på landhockeymål: Tilpasset; FIH innendørs standard; FIH utendørs standard; Junior; Mini; Liten trening; Ungdom; Annet
hr-HR: Standardna veličina gola za hokej na travi: Prilagođeno; Prema FIH pravilima za dvoranu; Prema FIH pravilima na otvorenom; Za juniore; Mini; Malo za trening; Za mlade; Ostalo
ru: Стандарт размера ворот для хоккея на траве: Пользовательский размер; По стандарту FIH для залов; По стандарту FIH для открытых полей; Юниорский; Мини; Малый тренировочный; Юношеский; Другое
ro-RO: Hochei pe gazon dimensiune standard: Personalizat; Standard FIH pentru interior; Standard FIH pentru exterior; Junior; Mini; Antrenament pe teren redus; Tineret; Altele
it: Standard relativi alle dimensioni della porta nell'hockey su prato: Personalizzato; Regolamento FIH indoor; Regolamento FIH outdoor; Junior; Mini; Allenamento (piccola); Ragazzi; Altro
sl-SI: Standardna velikost golov za hokej na travi: Po meri; Standardna velikost FIH (dvorana); Standardna velikost FIH (na prostem); Mladinska; Mini; Majhna za trening; Otroška; Drugo
cs: Standardní rozměry branky na pozemní hokej: Vlastní; Hala (standard FIH); Venkovní (standard FIH); Juniorské; Mini; Malé tréninkové; Mládež; Jiné
tr: Çim hokeyi kalesi boyut standardı: Özel; FIH kapalı alan nizami; FIH açık alan nizami; Genç; Mini; Küçük antrenman; Altyapı; Diğer
ja: フィールドホッケーのゴールサイズ標準: カスタム; FIHインドア規格; FIHアウトドア規格; ジュニア; ミニ; 小型トレーニング用; ユース; その他
fr: Norme de dimension du but de hockey sur gazon: Sur mesure; Réglementation FIH en salle; Réglementation FIH en extérieur; Junior; Mini; Petite taille (entraînement); Jeunes; Autre
nl: Veldhockeydoel maatnorm: Aangepast; FIH-indoorstandaard; FIH-outdoorstandaard; Junior; Mini; Kleine training; Jeugd; Overig
pt-PT: Baliza de hóquei em campo tamanho padrão: Personalizado; Regulamento de interior da FIH; Regulamento de exterior da FIH; Júnior; Mini; Treino pequeno; Juvenil; Outro
pl: Bramka do hokeja na trawie rozmiar standardowy: Niestandardowa; Zgodna z regulaminem FIH (hala); Zgodna z regulaminem FIH (otwarty teren); Junior; Mini; Mała treningowa; Młodzieżowa; Inna
zh-CN: 曲棍球球门尺寸标准: 自定义; FIH 室内标准; FIH 室外标准; 青少年; 迷你; 小型训练; 青年; 其他
da: Hockeymålets størrelsesstandard: Brugerdefineret; FIH-indendørsregulativ; FIH-udendørsregulativ; Junior; Mini; Lille (træning); Ungdom; Andet
de: Standardgröße des Feldhockeytors: Benutzerdefiniert; FIH-Hallenregularien; FIH-Feldregularien; Junior; Mini; Training klein; Jugend; Sonstige
sv: Storleksstandard för landhockeymål: Anpassad; FIH-standard (inomhus); FIH-standard (utomhus); Junior; Mini; Litet träningsmål; Ungdom; Övrigt
hu: Gyeplabdakapu méret szabvány: Egyedi; FIH beltéri szabvány; FIH kültéri szabvány; Junior; Mini; Kis edzőkapu; Ifjúsági; Egyéb
fi: Maahockeymaalin standardikoko: Mukautettu; FIH-sisäsääntöjen mukainen; FIH-ulkosääntöjen mukainen; Juniori; Mini; Pieni harjoitusmaali; Nuoret; Muu
ko: 필드하키 골대 크기 표준: 맞춤형; FIH 실내 규격; FIH 실외 규격; 주니어; 미니; 소형 훈련용; 유스; 기타
bg-BG: Стандартен размер на вратата за хокей на трева: По поръчка; FIH стандарт за зала; FIH стандарт за открито; За юноши; Мини; Малка тренировъчна; За младежи; Други